Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3209
Commission; powers and duties.

(1) The commission shall:

(a) Supervise the issuance of public information concerning the Door to College Scholarship Act; and

(b) Establish a reasonable and fair appeal procedure for students adversely affected by the actions of the commission or an eligible postsecondary educational institution in the distribution of funds or granting or termination of awards pursuant to the act.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 36.